New Jersey, session 222, A1691.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A board of education shall close the schools of the district on the day of a general election or on the day of a primary election for the general election. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Current law provides each board of education with the discretion to annually determine the dates on which the schools of the district will be in session, in accordance with law.  This bill requires a board of education to close the schools of the district on the day of a general election or on the day of a primary election for the general election.